District of Columbia statutes.
31-1112

Validity of agreements as secured transactions.

No filing of the premium finance agreement shall be necessary to perfect the validity of such agreement as a secured transaction as against creditors, subsequent purchasers, pledges, and encumbrances, successors, or assigns.

History

Oct. 9, 1940, ch. 792, ch. III, § 62
Apr. 18, 1966, 80 Stat. 126, Pub. L. 89-403, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1562.
1973 Ed., § 35-1372.